src/fst/stems/determiners.lexc
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2
! or any later version.

!! # Determiners

LEXICON detna
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Det+Sg:na # ;

LEXICON detnja
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ for *na* +Det+Sg
+Det+Sg:ña # ;

LEXICON detobl
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ for the oblique forms
+Det+Du:kuak # ;
+Det+Pl:kua # ;

LEXICON Determiners
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ here comes the list
agna:ak detobl ;
agna:ag detna ;
akimna:akim detna ;
akimna:akip detobl ;
amna:am detna ;
amna:ap detobl ;
igña:ig detnja ;
igña:ik detobl ;
imña:im detnja ;
imña:ip detobl ;
kanna:kan detna ;
kanna:kat detnja ;
kigña: kig detnja ;
kigña:kik detobl ;
komña:kim detnja ;
kimña:kip detobl ;
manna:man detna ;
manna:mat detobl ;
manna:ma detobl ;
pagna:pag detna ;
pagna.pak detobl ;
pakimna:pakim detna ;
pakimna:pakip detobl ;
pamna:pam detna ;
pamna:pap detobl ;
pigña:pig detna ;
pigña:pik detobl ;
qagna:qag detna ;
qagna:qak detobl ;
qakimna:qakim detna ;
qakimna:pakip detobl ;
qamna:qam detna ;
qamna:qap detobl ;
sakimna:sakim detna ;
sakimna:sakip detobl ;
samna:sam detna ;
samna:sap detobl ;
una:u detna ;
una:u detobl ;
unna:un detna ;
unna:ut detobl ;
